Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB390.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 304.3. Preceptor Tax Deduction.--(a) A taxpayer subject to the tax imposed by this article who is a health care provider engaged as a preceptor shall be entitled to a deduction of one thousand dollars ($1,000) from the taxable income of the taxpayer for a volunteer-based supervised clinical training 123456789101112131415161718192021 rotation supervised by the taxpayer, regardless of the number of volunteer-based supervised clinical training rotations supervised by the taxpayer.(b) The Preceptor Certification Committee is established within the department. The following apply:(1) The committee shall be composed of representatives of:(i) The Department of Health.(ii) The State Board of Medicine.(iii) The State Board of Nursing.(2) The committee shall develop and implement a plan for certifying applications for a tax deduction under this section, including:(i) Developing a process to ensure that requests for certification are reviewed and verifications are processed no later than thirty days following the close of each calendar year.(ii) Developing the documentation process for the committee to certify a preceptor for the tax deduction. The documentation to be collected shall include all of the following:(A) The preceptor's name, address, place of practice and license number.(B) The dates and hours of volunteer-based supervised clinical training rotations per eligible student.(C) Attestation that the preceptor is uncompensated for the volunteer-based supervised clinical training rotation.(D) Other information deemed necessary by the committee.(3) The committee shall:(i) Maintain records of the names, addresses and license numbers of the taxpayers claiming a deduction under this section.20250HB0390PN0355 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Certify the number of volunteer-based supervised clinical training rotations that each taxpayer conducted by verifying all of the following:(A) That the taxpayer meets the requirements to serve as a preceptor.(B) The number of hours that the taxpayer spent supervising an eligible student in each volunteer-based supervised clinical training rotation.(C) That the eligible student was enrolled in an academic program approved by the State Board of Nursing or State Board of Medicine.(D) That the taxpayer was uncompensated for each rotation.(iii) Upon each determination approving a deduction under this section, issue a certificate to the taxpayer certifying the deduction for the taxable year.(4) Application for a deduction under this section may not be submitted for certification prior to the supervised clinical training rotation being performed.(5) Members of the committee shall be immune from civil liability for any official act, decision or omission performed for the purpose for which the committee was established, except for any act, decision or omission that constitutes gross negligence or willful misconduct.(c) A taxpayer who receives a certificate in accordance with subsection (b)(3)(iii) shall file the certificate with the taxpayer's tax return with the department.(d) If the deduction allowed under this section is greater than the amount of tax due, no refund or carryover credit shall be allowed.(e) As used in this section, the following words and phrases 20250HB0390PN0355 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Academic program." An academic degree granting program or graduate medical education program."Committee." The Preceptor Certification Committee established under subsection (b)."Eligible student." An advanced practice registered nurse student, nurse anesthesia student, medical student, physician assistant student or registered nurse student who is enrolled in an academic program."Health care provider." A physician or osteopathic physician, advanced practice registered nurse, nurse anesthetist, physician assistant or registered nurse who holds a Pennsylvania license and maintains a professional primary care practice in this Commonwealth."Preceptor." A health care provider who is engaged in a volunteer-based supervised clinical training rotation."Primary care." The principal point of continuing care for patients provided by a health care provider, including health promotion, disease prevention, health maintenance, counseling, patient education, diagnosis and treatment of acute and chronic illnesses and coordination of other specialist care that the patients may need."Volunteer-based supervised clinical training rotation." An uncompensated period of supervised clinical training of an eligible student that totals at least eighty hours of supervisory time annually, in which a preceptor provides personalized instruction, training and supervision to an eligible student to enable the eligible student to obtain an eligible professional degree or training certificate.20250HB0390PN0355 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0390PN0355 - 5 - 1